North Carolina statutes. Chapter 164. Concerning the General Statutes of North Carolina.
Article 4. Sentencing Commission.

Editor’s Note.

This Article as originally enacted by Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, was to expire July 1, 1992. This date was subsequently extended to July 8, 1993 by Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12 and c. 816, s. 1; to August 1, 1993, by Session Laws 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; to July 1, 1994, by Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 200.1; to July 1, 1995, by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994) c. 591, s. 6(a); to July 1, 1997, by Session Laws 1995, c. 236, s. 1; to July 1, 1997 by Session Laws 1997-256, s. 6; to July 31, 1997, by Session Laws 1997-347, s. 2; to August 15, 1997, by Session Laws 1997-401, s. 2; and to August 29, 1997, by Session Laws 1997-418, s. 2. The Sentencing Commission was made permanent by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 18.6(b).

§ 164-35.
Commission established.

The North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission is established. As used in this Article, the term “Commission” means the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a).

Editor’s Note.

As to the provisions formerly providing for the expiration of this Article, see the Editor’s Note preceding this section.

For the text of sections 2 and 3 of the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission Act of 1990, Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), see c. 1076, ss. 2 and 3.

Session Laws 2004-186, s. 12.1, provides: “The General Assembly finds that the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission has adopted formal criteria for classifying felony offenses. The Sentencing Commission has identified three general types of harms: harms to persons (including both physical and mental injury); harms to property; and harms to society. The degrees of harm are divided into three levels:

“(1) Injury to person, property, or society;

“(2) Significant injury to person, property, or society; and

“(3) Serious injury to person, property, or society. The stated purpose of establishing the criteria was ‘to create a rational and consistent philosophical basis for classifying offenses; to assure proportionality in severity; and to provide a guidepost for classifying new crimes in the future.’

“In contrast to the felony classification criteria, the Commission did not create classification criteria for misdemeanors. However, the current misdemeanor sentencing laws include an assault offense that has serious injury as an element — even though ‘serious injury to a person’ is a category of harm for felony offense classification. The General Assembly finds that the classification of assault offenses that involve serious injury as misdemeanors is inconsistent with the Sentencing Commission’s classification of felonies based on harm.

“The North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, pursuant to its statutory responsibilities under Article 4 of Chapter 164 of the General Statutes, shall study the classification of misdemeanor offenses. In particular, the Commission shall examine the classification of assault offenses in relation to property offenses, crimes against society, and felony assault offenses. The Commission shall develop a system for classifying misdemeanor offenses on the basis of their severity. The Commission may consider reclassifying existing offenses and creating new offenses in order to insure proportionality and consistency. The Commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the 2005 General Assembly, 2005 Regular Session. The report shall describe the status of the Commission’s work and shall include any completed policy recommendations and proposed legislation. The Commission shall make a final report to the 2005 General Assembly, 2006 Regular Session.”

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 19.5, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that there be only three misdemeanor punishment levels: Class A1, Class 1, and Class 2.
The North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, in consultation with the Conference of District Attorneys, the Office of Indigent Defense Services, and the School of Government, shall review all Class 3 misdemeanor offenses and provide recommendations to the 2011 General Assembly for reclassifying each Class 3 misdemeanor as either an infraction or a Class 2 misdemeanor. The Commission may, in its discretion, consider other misdemeanor offenses for reclassification as infractions.”

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2010’.”

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2010-2011 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 32.6, is a severability clause.

§ 164-36.
Powers and duties.

Sentences established for violations of the State’s criminal laws should be based on the established purposes of our criminal justice and corrections systems. The Commission shall evaluate sentencing laws and policies in relationship to both the stated purposes of the criminal justice and corrections systems and the availability of sentencing options. The Commission shall make recommendations to the General Assembly for the modification of sentencing laws and policies, and for the addition, deletion, or expansion of sentencing options as necessary to achieve policy goals. The Commission shall make a report of its recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the General Assembly annually.

Dispositions established for violations by juveniles of the State’s criminal laws should be based on the established purposes set forth in Chapter 7B of the General Statutes. The Commission shall evaluate dispositional laws and policies in relationship to both the stated purposes of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes and the availability of dispositional alternatives. The Commission shall make recommendations to the General Assembly for the modification of dispositional laws and policies, and for the addition, deletion, or expansion of dispositional alternatives as necessary to achieve policy goals. The Commission shall make a report of its recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the General Assembly annually.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a), (c); 1998-202, s. 10(a).

§ 164-37.
Membership; chairman; meetings; quorum. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall consist of 28 members as follows:

The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall appoint a sitting or former Justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, who shall serve as Chairman of the Commission;

The Chief Judge of the North Carolina Court of Appeals, or another judge on the Court of Appeals, serving as his designee;

The Secretary of Public Safety or his designee;

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective January 1, 2011.

The Chairman of the Parole Commission, or his designee;

The President of the Conference of Superior Court Judges or his designee;

The President of the District Court Judges Association or his designee;

The President of the North Carolina Sheriff’s Association or his designee;

The President of the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police or his designee;

One member of the public at large, who is not currently licensed to practice law in North Carolina, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

Three members of the House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House;

Three members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint the representative of the North Carolina Community Sentencing Association that is recommended by the President of that organization;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint the member of the business community that is recommended by the President of the North Carolina Retail Merchants Association;

The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall appoint the criminal defense attorney that is recommended by the President of the North Carolina Academy of Trial Lawyers;

The President of the Conference of District Attorneys or his designee;

The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint the member of the North Carolina Victim Assistance Network that is recommended by the President of that organization;

A rehabilitated former prison inmate, to be appointed by the Chairman of the Commission;

The President of the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners or his designee;

The Governor shall appoint the member of the academic community, with a background in criminal justice or corrections policy, that is recommended by the President of The University of North Carolina;

The Attorney General, or a member of his staff, to be appointed by the Attorney General;

The Governor shall appoint the member of the North Carolina Bar Association that is recommended by the President of that organization.

A member of the Justice Fellowship Task Force, who is a resident of North Carolina, to be appointed by the Chairman of the Commission.

The President of the Association of Clerks of Superior Court of North Carolina, or his designee.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective January 1, 2011.

The Commission shall have its initial meeting no later than September 1, 1990, at the call of the Chairman. The Commission shall meet a minimum of four regular meetings each year. The Commission may also hold special meetings at the call of the Chairman, or by any four members of the Commission, upon such notice and in such manner as may be fixed by the rules of the Commission. A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; c. 535, s. 4; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418 s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-170, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 10(f); 2000-137, s. 4(kk); 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (i), (l); 2011-391, s. 43(c)-(e).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 164-37

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(c), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(g) by deleting “164-37” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by
2011-145, s. 19.1(g), which would have substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Crime Control and Public Safety” in subdivision (4), effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(d), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(i), by deleting “164-37” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by
2011-145, s. 19.1(i), which would have substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” in subdivision (3) effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subdivision (26).

Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “28 members” for “30 members” in the introductory language; substituted “Public Safety” for “Correction” in subdivision (3); deleted subdivision (4), which read: “The Secretary of Crime Control and Public Safety or his designee”; and deleted subdivision (26), which read: “A representative of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.”

§ 164-37.
Membership; chairman; meetings; quorum. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall consist of 28 members as follows:

The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall appoint a sitting or former Justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, who shall serve as Chairman of the Commission;

The Chief Judge of the North Carolina Court of Appeals, or another judge on the Court of Appeals, serving as his designee;

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction or his designee;

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective January 1, 2011.

The Chairman of the Parole Commission, or his designee;

The President of the Conference of Superior Court Judges or his designee;

The President of the District Court Judges Association or his designee;

The President of the North Carolina Sheriff’s Association or his designee;

The President of the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police or his designee;

One member of the public at large, who is not currently licensed to practice law in North Carolina, to be appointed by the Governor;

One member to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

Three members of the House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House;

Three members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint the representative of the North Carolina Community Sentencing Association that is recommended by the President of that organization;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint the member of the business community that is recommended by the President of the North Carolina Retail Merchants Association;

The Chief Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court shall appoint the criminal defense attorney that is recommended by the President of the North Carolina Academy of Trial Lawyers;

The President of the Conference of District Attorneys or his designee;

The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint the member of the North Carolina Victim Assistance Network that is recommended by the President of that organization;

A rehabilitated former prison inmate, to be appointed by the Chairman of the Commission;

The President of the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners or his designee;

The Governor shall appoint the member of the academic community, with a background in criminal justice or corrections policy, that is recommended by the President of The University of North Carolina;

The Attorney General, or a member of his staff, to be appointed by the Attorney General;

The Governor shall appoint the member of the North Carolina Bar Association that is recommended by the President of that organization.

A member of the Justice Fellowship Task Force, who is a resident of North Carolina, to be appointed by the Chairman of the Commission.

The President of the Association of Clerks of Superior Court of North Carolina, or his designee.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective January 1, 2011.

The Commission shall have its initial meeting no later than September 1, 1990, at the call of the Chairman. The Commission shall meet a minimum of four regular meetings each year. The Commission may also hold special meetings at the call of the Chairman, or by any four members of the Commission, upon such notice and in such manner as may be fixed by the rules of the Commission. A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; c. 535, s. 4; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418 s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-170, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 10(f); 2000-137, s. 4(kk); 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (i), (l); 2011-391, s. 43(c)-(e); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 164-37

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(c), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(g) by deleting “164-37” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by
2011-145, s. 19.1(g), which would have substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Crime Control and Public Safety” in subdivision (4), effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(d), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(i), by deleting “164-37” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by
2011-145, s. 19.1(i), which would have substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of Correction” in subdivision (3) effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subdivision (26).

Session Laws 2011-391, s. 43(e), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “28 members” for “30 members” in the introductory language; substituted “Public Safety” for “Correction” in subdivision (3); deleted subdivision (4), which read: “The Secretary of Crime Control and Public Safety or his designee”; and deleted subdivision (26), which read: “A representative of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in subdivision (3). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-38.
Terms of members; compensation; expenses.

The terms of existing members shall expire on June 30, 1997, unless they resign or are removed. New members shall be appointed or the existing members reappointed by the appointing authorities to serve terms of two years, unless they resign or are removed. Members serving by virtue of elective or appointive office or as designees of such officeholders may serve only so long as the officeholders hold those respective offices. Members appointed by the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may be removed by the appointing authority without cause. Vacancies occurring before the expiration of a term shall be filled in the manner provided for the members first appointed. A member of the Commission may be removed only for disability, neglect of duty, incompetence, or malfeasance in office. Before removal, the member is entitled to a hearing. Effective with respect to members designated on or after July 1, 1992, a person making a designation pursuant to

G.S. 164-37

may not make another designation, except that the person’s successor in elective or appointive office may make a new designation.

The Commission members shall receive no salary for serving. All Commission members shall receive necessary subsistence and travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, and 138-6 as applicable.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 3; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1(b); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a), (b); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; c. 236, s. 2; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a), (b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 164-39.
Executive director and other staff.

The Commission shall employ an Executive Director from candidates presented to it by the Chairman and the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. The Executive Director shall have appropriate training and experience to assist the Commission in the performance of its duties. The Executive Director shall be responsible for compiling the work of the Commission and drafting suggested legislation incorporating the Commission’s findings for submission to the General Assembly.

Subject to the approval of the Chairman, the Executive Director shall employ such other staff and shall contract for services as is necessary to assist the Commission in the performance of its duties, and as funds permit.

The Commission may, with the approval of the Legislative Services Commission, meet in the State Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building, or may meet in an area provided by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. Commission staff shall use office space provided by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a).

§ 164-40.
Correction population simulation model; Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities population simulation model. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall develop a correctional population simulation model, and shall have first priority to apply the model to a given fact situation, or theoretical change in the sentencing laws, when requested to do so by the Chairman, the Executive Director, or the Commission as a whole.The Executive Director or the Chairman shall make the model available to respond to inquiries by any State legislator, or by the Secretary of Public Safety, in second priority to the work of the Commission.

The Commission shall develop a Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities population simulation model, and shall have first priority to apply the model to a given fact situation, or theoretical change in the dispositional laws set forth in Chapter 7B of the General Statutes, when requested to do so by the Chairman, the Executive Director, or the Commission as a whole.The Executive Director or the Chairman shall make the model available to respond to inquiries by any State legislator, or by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, in second priority to the work of the Commission.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(b); 2000-137, s. 4(ii); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (l); 2011-391, s. 43(f); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmmm).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(f), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19(h), by deleting “164-40” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), which would have substituted “Secretary of the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Secretary of the Department of Correction” in the second paragraph of subsection (a) effective January 1, 2012, never took effect. Instead, subsection (a) was amended by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(i) and (
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of the Department of Correction” in subsection (a) and substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmmm), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” for “Division of Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and throughout the section.

§ 164-40.
Correction population simulation model; juvenile justice facilities population simulation model. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall develop a correctional population simulation model, and shall have first priority to apply the model to a given fact situation, or theoretical change in the sentencing laws, when requested to do so by the Chairman, the Executive Director, or the Commission as a whole.

The Executive Director or the Chairman shall make the model available to respond to inquiries by any State legislator, by the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety, or by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, in second priority to the work of the Commission.

The Commission shall develop a population simulation model for juvenile justice facilities and shall have first priority to apply the model to a given fact situation, or theoretical change in the dispositional laws set forth in Chapter 7B of the General Statutes, when requested to do so by the Chairman, the Executive Director, or the Commission as a whole.

The Executive Director or the Chairman shall make the model available to respond to inquiries by any State legislator, or by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, in second priority to the work of the Commission.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 1998-202, s. 10(b); 2000-137, s. 4(ii); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (l); 2011-391, s. 43(f); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmmm); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ssss).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(f), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19(h), by deleting “164-40” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), which would have substituted “Secretary of the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Secretary of the Department of Correction” in the second paragraph of subsection (a) effective January 1, 2012, never took effect. Instead, subsection (a) was amended by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ssss), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(i) and (
l
), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Secretary of the Department of Correction” in subsection (a) and substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmmmmmm), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” for “Division of Juvenile Justice” in the section heading and throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ssss), substituted “juvenile justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the section heading; substituted “by the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety, or by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction,” for “or by the Secretary of Public Safety,” in the second paragraph of subsection (a); substituted “a population simulation model for juvenile justice facilities” for “a Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety facilities population simulation model,” in subsection (b); and substituted “the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety,” for “the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety,” in the second paragraph of subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-41.
Classification of offenses — ranges of punishment.

The Commission shall classify criminal offenses into felony and misdemeanor categories on the basis of their severity.

In determining the proper category for each felony and misdemeanor, the Commission shall consider, to the extent that they have relevance, the following:

The nature and degree of harm likely to be caused by the offense, including whether it involves property, irreplaceable property, a person, number of persons, or a breach of the public trust;

The deterrent effect a particular classification may have on the commission of the offense by others;

The current incidence of the offense in the State as a whole;

The rights of the victim.

For each classification of felonies and misdemeanors formulated pursuant to subsection (b), the Commission shall assign a suggested range of punishment. The Commission shall take into consideration the current range of punishment for each offense.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, s. 1; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a).

§ 164-42.
Sentencing structures. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall recommend structures for use by a sentencing court in determining the most appropriate sentence to be imposed in a criminal case, including:

Imposition of an active term of imprisonment;

Imposition of a term of probation;

Suspension of a sentence to imprisonment and imposition of probation with conditions, including the appropriate probation option or options, including house arrest, regular probation, intensive supervision, restitution, and community service;

Based upon the combination of offense and defendant characteristics in each case, the presumptively appropriate length of a term of probation, or a term of imprisonment;

Ordering multiple sentences to terms of imprisonment to run concurrently or consecutively;

For a sentence to probation without a suspended sentence to imprisonment, the maximum term of confinement to be imposed if the defendant violates the conditions of probation.

The sentencing structures shall be consistent with the goals, policies, and purposes of the criminal justice and corrections systems, as set forth in Sections 2 and 3 of the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission Act of 1990. As part of its work, the Commission shall offer recommendations for the incorporation of those sections into the sentencing laws of North Carolina. In formulating structures, the Commission also shall consider:

The nature and characteristics of the offense;

The severity of the offense in relation to other offenses;

The characteristics of the defendant that mitigate or aggravate the seriousness of his criminal conduct and the punishment deserved therefor;

The defendant’s number of prior convictions;

The available resources and constitutional capacity of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, local confinement facilities, and community-based sanctions;

The rights of the victims;

That felony offenders sentenced to an active term of imprisonment, or whose suspended sentence to imprisonment is activated, should serve a designated minimum percentage of their sentences before they are eligible for parole; and

That misdemeanor offenders sentenced to an active term of imprisonment, or whose suspended sentence to imprisonment is activated, should serve a designated minimum percentage of their sentence before they are eligible for parole.

The Commission shall also consider the policy issues set forth in

G.S. 164-42.1

in developing its sentencing structures.

The Commission shall include with each set of sentencing structures a statement of its estimate of the effect of the sentencing structures on the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice and local facilities, both in terms of fiscal impact and on inmate population. If the Commission finds that the proposed sentencing structures will result in inmate populations in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice and local confinement facilities that exceed the standard operating capacity, then the Commission shall present an additional set of structures that are consistent with that capacity. For purposes of this subsection, “standard operating capacity” means the total capacity expected to be available in both local confinement facilities and in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice once all the proceeds of bonds authorized by Chapter 933 of the 1989 Session Laws and Chapter 935 of the 1989 Session Laws have been expended for the construction of prison facilities.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1076, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 812, s. 12; c. 816, ss. 1, 5; 1993, c. 253, s. 5.1; c. 321, s. 200.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 591, s. 6(a); 1995, c. 236, s. 1; 1997-256, s. 6; 1997-347, s. 2; 1997-401, s. 2; 1997-418, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 18.6(a); 2009-372, s. 8; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-391, s. 43(f); 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnnn).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 164-42

.

Cross References.

As to legislation regarding blended sentencing, see the editor’s note at

G.S. 7B-2500

.

Editor’s Note.

For the text of sections 2 and 3 of the Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission Act of 1990, Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), see c. 1076, ss. 2 and 3.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 816, which amended this section, in s. 6, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to appropriate funds to implement the provisions of this act.”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), provides, in part: “In any other instances in which the term ‘Department of Correction’ appears in the General Statutes, the Revisor of Statutes shall replace ‘Department of Correction’ with ‘Division of Adult Correction’, and in any other instances in which the word ‘Department’ is used to refer to the Department of Correction, the Revisor of Statutes shall delete the word ‘Department’ and substitute the word ‘Division’. ” Pursuant to that authority, the Revisor of Statutes has directed that “Division of Adult Correction” be substituted for “Department of Correction” throughout this section.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2011-391, s. 43(f), effective July 1, 2011, amended Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19(h), by deleting “164-42” from the list of sections. The amendment to this section by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 19.1(h), which would have substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” effective January 1, 2012, never took effect.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-372, s. 8, effective December 1, 2009, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, substituted “supervision” for “probation” near the end of subdivision (a)(4).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.